District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.05

Revocation or subsequent limitation of certificate of authority.

If a merchant bank fails to maintain the standards and requirements of this chapter, the Commissioner shall, by order, revoke or limit the exercise of the powers of the merchant bank’s authority.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 305, 48 DCR 3244